Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0801

Members' contributions.

Unless the organic rules establish the amount, manner, or method of determining any contribution requirements for members, the board of directors may establish the amount, manner, or other method of determining any contribution requirements for members.

[ 2019 c 37 s 801.]